sl-SI: Vrsta ojačitve prstnega predela: Celotna konica; Nevidna ojačitev; Brez ojačitve na prstih; Odprti prsti; Strojno pletena konica; Ojačana konica; Konica za sandale; Brezšivna konica; Prosojna konica; Drugo
pt-PT: Tipo de reforço na biqueira: Biqueira completa; Biqueira invisível; Sem biqueira; Biqueira aberta; Biqueira recíproca; Biqueira reforçada; Biqueira de sandália; Biqueira sem costuras; Biqueira transparente; Outra
zh-CN: 脚趾加固类型: 趾部全加固; 隐形趾部加固; 趾部无加固; 露趾; 往复编织趾部; 趾部加固; 凉鞋趾部; 无缝趾部; 透明趾部; 其他
ja: トゥ強化タイプ: フルトゥ; インビジブルトゥ; ノートゥ; オープントゥ; レシプロケイトトゥ; つま先補強; サンダルトゥ; シームレストゥ; シアートゥ; その他
zh-TW: 鞋頭加固類型: 全趾; 透明趾; 無趾; 露趾; 立體腳趾; 加固腳趾; 涼鞋趾; 無縫腳趾; 透明趾; 其他
lt-LT: Kojos pirštų sutvirtinimo tipas: Pilnai sutvirtinta nosis; Nematomas sutvirtinimas; Be sutvirtinimo; Atvira nosis; Formuota nosis; Sutvirtinta nosis; Sandalų tipo; Besiūlė nosis; Permatoma nosis; Kita
cs: Typ vyztužení špičky: Plná špička; Neviditelná špička; Bez špičky; Otevřená špička; Tvarovaná špička; Zesílená špička; Sandálová špička; Bezešvá špička; Průhledná špička; Jiné
bg-BG: Тип подсилване на пръстите: Цялостно подсилени пръсти; Невидимо подсилени пръсти; Без подсилване; Отворени пръсти; Оформени пръсти; Подсилени пръсти; Тип „сандал“; Безшевни пръсти; Прозрачни пръсти; Друго
el: Τύπος ενίσχυσης πέλματος: Πλήρης κάλυψη; Αόρατη ενίσχυση; Χωρίς ενίσχυση; Ανοιχτά δάκτυλα; Αναδιπλούμενη ενίσχυση; Ενισχυμένα δάκτυλα; Για πέδιλα (sandal toe); Χωρίς ραφές; Διάφανα δάκτυλα; Άλλο
tr: Burun takviye tipi: Tam burun; Görünmez burun; Burunsuz; Açık burun; Örgü burun; Güçlendirilmiş burun; Sandalet burun; Dikişsiz burun; Şeffaf burun; Diğer
fr: Type de renfort au niveau des orteils: Orteil complet; Orteil invisible; Sans orteil; Bout ouvert; Bout façonné; Bout renforcé; Bout sandale; Bout sans couture; Bout transparent; Autre
nl: Type teenversterking: Volledige neus; Onzichtbare neus; Geen neus; Open neus; Ingeweven neus; Verstevigde neus; Sandaalneus; Naadloze neus; Transparante neus; Overige
th: ประเภทการเสริมความแข็งแรงบริเวณปลายเท้า: เสริมเต็มนิ้วเท้า; เสริมแบบซ่อน; ไม่เสริม; เปิดนิ้วเท้า; เสริมแบบทอโค้ง; เสริมความแข็งแรงที่นิ้วเท้า; เสริมแบบโปร่งแสง; เสริมแบบไร้รอยต่อ; เสริมแบบบางใส; อื่นๆ
sk-SK: Typ výstuže špičky: Plná špička; Neviditeľná špička; Bez špičky; Otvorená špička; Tvarovaná špička; Zosilnená špička; Sandálová špička; Bezšvová špička; Priesvitná špička; Iné
fi: Varpaiden vahvistuksen tyyppi: Koko kärki; Näkymätön kärki; Ei kärkivahviketta; Avokärki; Muotoon neulottu kärki; Vahvistettu kärki; Sandaalikärki; Saumaton kärki; Läpinäkyvä kärki; Muu
hu: Lábujjrész megerősítésének típusa: Teljes orr; Láthatatlan orr; Orr nélküli; Nyitott orr; Szabott orr; Megerősített orr; Szandál orr; Varrás nélküli orr; Átlátszó orr; Egyéb
vi: Loại gia cố mũi giày: Kín ngón chân; Mũi tàng hình; Không mũi; Hở ngón; Mũi dệt kim đan chéo; Mũi gia cố; Mũi mang sandal; Mũi không đường may; Mũi xuyên thấu; Khác
pt-BR: Tipo de reforçador da ponta: Dedo inteiro; Ponta invisível; Sem ponta; Ponta aberta; Ponta anatômica; Ponta reforçada; Ponta para sandália; Ponta sem costura; Ponta transparente; Outros
pl: Typ wzmocnienia palców: Pełne wzmocnienie; Niewidoczne wzmocnienie palców; Brak wzmocnienia palców; Odkryte palce; Wzmocnienie profilowane; Wzmocnione palce; Sandal toe (niewidoczne szwy palców); Bezszwowe wykończenie palców; Półprzezroczyste palce; Inne
hr-HR: Vrsta ojačanja prstiju: Puni prsti; Nevidljivi prsti; Bez prstiju; Otvoreni prsti; Oblikovani prsti (reciprocated); Ojačani prsti; Za sandale (sandal toe); Prsti bez šavova; Prozirni prsti; Ostalo
da: Type af tåforstærkning: Fuld tå; Usynlig tå; Ingen tå; Åben tå; Pendlet tå; Forstærket tå; Sandaltå; Sømløs tå; Tynd tå; Andet
it: Tipo di rinforzo delle dita del piede: Punta intera; Punta invisibile; Nessuna punta; Punta aperta; Punta sagomata; Punta rinforzata; Punta a sandalo; Punta senza cuciture; Punta velata; Altro
sv: Typ av tåförstärkning: Hel tå; Osynlig tå; Ingen tå; Öppen tå; Pendelstickad tå; Förstärkt tå; Sandaltå; Sömlös tå; Genomskinlig tå; Övrigt
de: Art der Zehenverstärkung: Voll verstärkte Zehenpartie; Unsichtbar verstärkt; Keine Verstärkung; Offene Zehenpartie; Ausgeformte Zehenpartie; Verstärkte Zehenpartie; Sandalenspitze; Nahtlose Zehenpartie; Transparente Zehenpartie; Sonstige
ru: Тип усиления носка: Полное усиление мыска; Невидимое усиление мыска; Без усиления мыска; Открытый мысок; Вывязанный мысок; Усиленный мысок; Прозрачный мысок (для босоножек); Бесшовный мысок; Прозрачный мысок; Другое
ko: 발가락 보강 유형: 풀 토; 인비저블 토; 노 토; 오픈 토; 입체 편직 토; 강화 토; 샌들 토; 심리스 토; 시어 토; 기타
es: Tipo de refuerzo de la puntera: Puntera completa; Puntera invisible; Sin puntera; Puntera abierta; Puntera reciprocada; Puntera reforzada; Puntera para sandalias; Puntera sin costuras; Puntera transparente; Otro
ro-RO: Tip de ranforsare la vârf: Vârf întărit complet; Întăritură invizibilă; Fără vârf; Vârf decupat; Vârf cusut anatomic; Vârf întărit; Vârf invizibil (sandală); Vârf fără cusături; Vârf transparent; Altele
en: Toe reinforcement type: Full toe; Invisible toe; No toe; Open toe; Reciprocated toe; Reinforced toe; Sandal toe; Seamless toe; Sheer toe; Other
nb: Forsterkningstype for tå: Hel tå; Usynlig tå; Ingen tå; Åpen tå; Strikket tå; Forsterket tå; Sandaltå; Sømløs tå; Gjennomsiktig tå; Annet